Massachusetts, session 194th, S2172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 7. Section 4 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is amended
by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(a) Except as permitted pursuant to this section and section 7, for the procurement of a
supply or service for a governmental body in the amount of $10,000 or greater, but not to exceed
$100,000, a procurement officer shall seek written quotations from not fewer than 3 persons
customarily providing the supply or service. The procurement officer shall record the: (i) names
and addresses of all persons from whom quotations were sought; (ii) purchase description used
for the procurement; (iii) names of the persons submitting quotations; and (iv) date and amount
of each quotation. Such information shall be retained in the file required pursuant to section 3. A
governmental body may require that any procurement for the governmental body in an amount of
not more than $100,000 shall be subject to section 5 or section 6.
of 2

SECTION 8. Section 5 of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2 to 4, the words “$50,000 or, in the case of a municipal or regional school
district, award of procurement contracts in the amount of more than $100,000,” and inserting in
place thereof the following word:- $100,000.
SECTION 9. Said section 5 of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 37 to 39, the words “on the COMMBUYS system administered
by the operational services division” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- through
additional means reasonably calculated to notify the public of the opportunity.
SECTION 10. Said section 5 of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 40 and 41, the words “$50,000, or, for a municipal or regional
school district, more than”.
SECTION 11. Section 6 of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “$50,000, or, a municipal or regional school district,
more than $100,000” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- $100,000.
SECTION 12. Section 6A of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “$50,000, or, a municipal or regional school district,
more than $100,000,” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- $100,000.
SECTION 13. Section 7 of said chapter 30B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “$50,000, or, a municipal or regional school district,
more than $100,000,” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- $100,000.
of 2